Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.030

Board of directors established—Membership.

A statewide jail industries board of directors is established. The board shall consist of the following members:

(1) One sheriff and one police chief, to be selected by the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(2) One county commissioner or one county councilmember to be selected by the Washington state association of counties;

(3) One city official to be selected by the association of Washington cities;

(4) Two jail administrators to be selected by the Washington state jail association, one of whom shall be from a county or a city with an established jail industries program;

(5) One prosecuting attorney to be selected by the Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(6) One administrator from a city or county corrections department to be selected by the Washington correctional association;

(7) One county clerk to be selected by the Washington association of county clerks;

(8) Three representatives from labor to be selected by the governor. The representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide labor organizations representing a cross section of trade organizations;

(9) Three representatives from business to be selected by the governor. The representatives may be chosen from a list of nominations provided by statewide business organizations representing a cross section of businesses, industries, and all sizes of employers;

(10) The governor's representative from the employment security department;

(11) One member representing crime victims, to be selected by the governor;

(12) One member representing online law enforcement officers, to be selected by the governor;

(13) One member from the department of commerce to be selected by the governor;

(14) One member representing higher education, vocational education, or adult basic education to be selected by the governor; and

(15) The governor's representative from the correctional industries division of the state department of corrections shall be an ex officio member for the purpose of coordination and cooperation between prison and jail industries and to further a positive relationship between state and local government offender programs.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2023; 1995 c 399 s 45; 1993 c 285 s 3.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.